


Sean Anthony Cash - Wichita, KS | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Sean Anthony Cash in Wichita, KS


Sean Anthony Cash

                                                                           Intelius found that Sean Anthony Cash  is  a male between 40 and 50 years old from Wichita, KS.  We have connected them to
                12 addresses,
                6 phones,
                and 2 relatives or associates.
         





Also Known As

Sean J Cash


Get Report Now

Age

Sean Anthony Cash is in his 40s

Sean Has Lived In

Wichita, KS
Manhattan, KS
Bethany Beach, DE

Sean's Relatives

Aubree Cash
Julie Cash







Sean Anthony Cash



Zodiac SignCapricorn



GenderMale



Professional Status
Vice President at Associated Integrated Marketing



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Sean? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Sean, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Sean Anthony Cash
Get a Criminal Check on Sean Anthony Cash
Get a Public Record Report on Sean Anthony Cash
Get a People Search Report on Sean Anthony Cash


Sean Anthony Cash's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Sean Anthony Cash has lived as well as Sean Anthony Cash's phone numbers and email addresses.




Sean Anthony Cash Has Lived in 2 States
Kansas Address for Sean Anthony Cash


14901 W M******* S* 

Wichita, KS


Has Lived In

Wichita, KS
Manhattan, KS


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Sean Anthony Cash

(316) ***-**** - Wichita, KS 
(316) ***-**** - Wichita, KS 
(316) ***-**** - Wichita, KS 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Sean Anthony Cash

s*********0@***.com
s****h@***.com
s****h@***.com


Get Email Report




Sean Anthony Cash's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Sean Anthony Cash's academic history.  Find out which schools Sean Anthony Cash attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Sean Anthony Cash received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Sean Anthony Cash Has Attended 1 School
Clearwater High School 1983 – 1987                              


Sean Anthony Cash's Professional Information
Information regarding Sean Anthony Cash's professional history.  Find out previous places Sean Anthony Cash has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Sean Anthony Cash Has Worked at 1 Place
Company: Associated Integrated Marketing
               Title: Vice President
Sean Anthony Cash's Experience
Title: Vice President
               Company: Associated Integrated Marketing
Job Details
               Company Size: $5 mil to less than $10 mil - Employee Range: 25 to less than 100
Additional Professional Information on Sean Anthony Cash

 See Sean Anthony Cash's LinkedIn Profile



Sean Anthony Cash's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Sean Anthony Cash


Sean Anthony Cash's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Sean Anthony Cash's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Sean Cash
Username Matches

                  SeanCash
                  CashSean
                  Sean.Cash
                  Cash.Sean
                  Sean_Cash
                  Cash_Sean
                  Sean-Cash
                  Cash-Sean
                  SCash
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
S Cash







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.













Sean Anthony  Cash - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











Sean Anthony  Cash
Check out list of companies and businesses related to Sean Anthony  Cash. Find out Sean Anthony  Cash address and contact details. View other people related to Sean Anthony  Cash - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

8918 W. 21ST ST. NORTH #200-117  WICHITA 67205-1880 KS




Companies related to Sean Anthony  Cash
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0001494582BOSTON OMAHA Corp292 NEWBURY STREET, SUITE 333  BOSTON 02115




Sean Anthony  Cash on the Web
Persons related to Sean Anthony  Cash - BOSTON OMAHA CorpNamePositionCityPeterson  AdamBostonPeterson  AdamBostonRozek  AlexBostonRozek  AlexBostonBoulderado Capital, LLCBOSTONBoulderado Group, LLC10% Owner BOSTONBoulderado Partners, LLCBOSTONBriner  BradfordBostonKeating  BrendanBostonKeating  BrendanBostonBradford B  BrinerDirector CHAPEL HILLSean Anthony  CashWICHITABrendan Joseph  KeatingDirector LAS VEGASFrank H.  Kenan IIBOSTONMAGNOLIA CAPITAL FUND, LP10% Owner OMAHAMAGNOLIA GROUP, LLCOMAHAJames A.  McLaughlinBOSTONAdam K  PetersonOMAHAJeffrey Charles  PiermontOfficer NEW YORKAlexander Buffett  RozekBOSTONMichael Jeffrey  SchollSubsidiary President BOSTONRobert Thomas  SlezakOMAHAVishnu  SrinivasanBOSTONJoshua Paul  WeisenburgerChief Financial Officer OMAHA
Potentially same personNameCityCountryAnthony  SeanJACKSONVILLEFL












 






    Sean Stegmann | Cash Crusaders Franchising Ltd | ZoomInfo.com































Ca$h (2010) - Rotten Tomatoes



























 





















                            Home
                        



                            Top Box Office
                        



                            Tickets & Showtimes
                        



                            DVD & Streaming
                        



                                TV
                            



                            News
                        













×Close

What is the Tomatometer®?



                    The Tomatometer rating – based on the published opinions of hundreds of film and
                    television critics – is a trusted measurement of movie and TV programming quality
                    for millions of moviegoers. It represents the percentage of professional critic reviews
                    that are positive for a given film or television show.
                




From the Critics




From RT Users Like You!






Fresh
The Tomatometer is 60% or higher.



Rotten
The Tomatometer is 59% or lower.



Certified Fresh

                                Movies and TV shows are Certified Fresh with a steady Tomatometer of 75% or
                                higher after a set amount of reviews (80 for wide-release movies, 40 for
                                limited-release movies, 20 for TV shows), including 5 reviews from Top Critics.
                            




Audience Score
Percentage of users who rate a movie or TV show positively.



Learn More 




































PLAY TRAILER


                                    Ca$h (2010)





                Ca$h (2010)







Add Article








                    All Critics
                

 | 


                    Top Critics
                



            TOMATOMETER 



Tomatometer Not Available...
——








Tomatometer Not Available...
——











     AUDIENCE SCORE
        






29%

liked it




Average Rating:
            2.8/5
                

User Ratings:
        1,149



Critic Consensus:
            No consensus yet.










Ca$h Videos





                    View All Videos (1)







Ca$h Photos





                    View All Photos (3)

















Movie Info


    A suitcase full of cash spells big trouble for a Chicago couple, who quickly find out that their big windfall comes with some barbed-wire strings attached. Sam Phelan (Chris Hemsworth) was just driving down the street when his life changed in the blink of an eye. Now, Sam and his wife, Leslie (Victoria Profeta), will never have to worry about money again. They will, however, have to worry about Pyke Kubic (Sean Bean), a vicious criminal who has every intention of finding his lost cash. When Pyke discovers that Sam and Leslie have already spent a sizable portion of the loot, he hatches a plan to make them work off their debt by robbing stores. Realizing that the only way out of their mess is through the thick of it, the clean-cut couple begins their life of crime, sinking ever deeper down a spiraling pool of obligation and desperation. ~ Jason Buchanan, Rovi


Rating: 
R (for language, violence and some sexual content)


Genre: 


                        Mystery & Suspense


Directed By: 

Stephen Milburn Anderson


Written By: 

Stephen Milburn Anderson


In Theaters: 

Apr 9, 2010
 wide



On Disc/Streaming: 

Aug 17, 2010



Runtime: 


                    118 minutes
                



Studio: 

Roadside Attractions






Watch it now








                                Watch now
                            








                            Watch now
                        








                            Watch now
                        










Cast








                Sean Bean

as Pyke Kubic








                Chris Hemsworth

as Sam Phelan








                Victoria Profeta

as Leslie Phelan








                Anthony Thekkek

as Bahadurjik Tejeenderpeet Singh








                Glenn Plummer

as Glen








                Mike Starr

as Melvin Goldberg








                Michael Mantell

as Mr. Dale



                Show More Cast 








Critic Reviews for Ca$h


All Critics (1)

                    | Fresh (0)
                    | Rotten (1)
                    | DVD (1)










                    Offers inept cinematography, stiff performances, and Sean Bean using a kitchen sink sprayer to mimic urination. The picture doesn't exactly live up to the sizzling potential of the genre.

                    March 24, 2010 | Rating: D | Full Review…







Brian OrndorfBrianOrndorf.com




View All Critic Reviews (1) 




Audience Reviews for Ca$h









                   No one can be trusted when it comes to... 

Good entertaining movie!  Ca$h isn't a thriller in academic film terms. It's not a traditional action film, either. If the film must have a label, it is neo noir satire. Noir features a desperate protagonist who is an anti-hero. "Ca$h" is an entertaining movie where everybody is corrupt in the end, even those that have been robbed and declare a larger amount to benefit with the insurance. Sean Bean performs a peculiar but very dangerous criminal with a great knowledge of economics. Chris Hemsworth is the typical American low middle class with a great alienation and lack of general culture. The screenplay is enjoyable and the resolution of the situation is satisfactory. 

A stroke of good luck turns lethal for Sam Phelan and his wife Leslie when they are faced with a life-changing decision that brings strange and sinister Pyke Kubic to their doorstep. As Pyke leads Sam and Leslie on a tumultuous adventure through the streets of Chicago, each are pulled deeper and deeper into a desperate spiral of deception and violence... All in the name of money.








            Manu Gino Super Reviewer










                   Nothing special or even particularly good here, but it's watchable. The dialogue was really bad, however. The actress was also not so good. Chris Hemsworth is probably the only decent thing about this silly little movie...








            Cynthia S. Super Reviewer








½

                   Corny and predictable, yet annoyingly enjoyable, would have loved to see a tweist at the end of this film, but the plot is very straight forward in an easy watching way.

Whilst I often have a problem with English accents in American all sounding the same, Sean Bean uses his own Sheffield accent in this film and I guess I would have to put it to not Brits to say whether that works or not.

The double role for Bean was also a little cheesy, hasn't this been done too many times?  As early as the Norman Wisdom days?








            Lady D'arbanville Super Reviewer










                   Oh this is bad, what a waste. Sean Bean is on auto pilot in this, dialogue and acting is terrible. Little or close to no real action, must have been a low budget TV film. Just skip it and save that 90mins for something else!








            Dean King Super Reviewer






                    View All Audience Reviews 




Ca$h Quotes









There are no approved quotes yet for this movie.






Discussion Forum


Discuss Ca$h on our Movie forum!


            Go to Forum
        





News & Features










Cosplay Photos
See over 300 images from Comic-Con!









Comic-Con!
See ever trailer, teaser, and clip revealed this year









Best Superhero Movies
The 50 best superhero movies by Tomatometer









Castlevania
The Netflix series breaks an RT record





More News & Features 



TOP HEADLINES




                    June Foray: 1917-2017

– Variety



Wonder Woman Sequel Set for December 2019

– Variety



                    James Cameron Planning Terminator ‘Reinvention’ Trilogy

– We Got This Covered



                    Melissa McCarthy Has Super-Intelligence

– Variety



                    National Geographic Developing The Right Stuff Scripted Series

– Variety



                    Daniel Craig Set to Return as James Bond

– New York Times



                    Anne Hathaway in Talks to Step in for Amy Schumer on Barbie

– Variety



                    25th James Bond Movie Set for November 2019

– Variety



More Headlines 





















 




















Sean Dcash (Anthony), 47  - Hagerstown, MD | MyLife.com™ Background Profile



































Search for your public page


First Name



Last Name



City





Search


*All fields are required
Already a member? Log in


















About & Contact Info






                    Photos && Social Posts






Reviews & Ratings





Court & ArrestRecords





Friends & Family












 SD


View Photos



 Edit/Remove

Sean Dcash
 Hagerstown, MD
 Age: 47 -
								07/11/1970







AKA:
                                                Sean Anthony Cash, Sean A Dcash, Sean A Cash, Sean Cash













Work Info







Marital Status






Unavailable






 Politics









Education Info





  Edit/Remove My Info

View Full Contact Info
- OR -
View Full Background Details







Reputation Score:
4.00/5




4.00

							        	
													(1 Review)
												






                                        Rate:
                                        
                                            Sean










Improve my Rating
                                                |  
                                                 Ask others to Rate




Ranking: 
Compared to U.S. Population




BAD
POOR
FAIR
GOOD











  Edit/Remove My Info
Contact Info







View Phone Number










****@reunionemail.com

                                
                                     |  Send Message











20*** **** Dr


Hagerstown, MD 21742







View Full Contact Details
- OR -
View Full Background Details








 + {{bingImagesInit.images.length - 4}} more
 + {{bingImagesInit.images.length - 3}} more



Summary:
                    
                        Sean Dcash  was born in 1970.
        Sean
                   currently lives in 



Hagerstown
.
        
                     Before that, he lived in
                        



Frederick
, MD
                                          from 2005 to 2013.
                                    















About & Contact Information


Sean's Story






Please Wait...


            Sean Dcash  was born in 1970.
            Sean
                currently lives in 



Hagerstown
.
            
                        Before that, he lived in
                        



Frederick
, MD
                                        from 2005 to 2013.
                                    





Contact Information





                            This section includes information on Addresses, Phone Numbers, and Email Addresses
                        




                                                Recent Address
                                            
20*** **** Dr
Hagerstown, MD
View Address


Past Address
60*** **** 111




Frederick
, MD
View Address


Past Address
P*** **** 793




Dunbar
, WV
View Address


Past Address
60*** **** Ave




Frederick
, MD
View Address


Past Address





Frederick
, MD
View Address


Past Address





Dunbar
, WV
View Address




Email Address
****@reunionemail.com
View Email





    Sean may have hidden Social Profiles & Photos - Check Full Background Report to see Sean's social media activity. This may contain online profiles, dating websites, forgotten social media accounts, and other potentially embarrassing profiles. This may also contain additional contact information, giving you more ways to get in touch.
                




View Full Phone, Email & Address Details





Work History





    Sean may have Work information - Check Full Background Report to see possible job history including what current and previous jobs, companies they may have been employed at, job titles, duration of employment,  and a list of their co-workers.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





School History




    Sean may have Education Information - Check Full Background Report to see possible education history including where and when they attending high school and college, and a complete list of their high school class list.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





Properties




    Sean may have Properties - Check Full Background Report to see a complete list of known properties. This may contain information such as address, market value, purchase price,  and loan amount.


                View Full Background Details
            





Corporate Affiliations




    Sean may have Corporate Affiliations - Check Full Background Report to see a complete list of known corporate affiliations. This may contain information such as company name, job title, address, and time period of service.


                View Full Background Details
            





Licenses and Permits




    Sean may have Licenses & Permits - Check Full Background Report to see weapons permits, Federal Aviation Administration pilot licenses and Drug Enforcement Administration licenses for prescribing controlled pharmaceuticals. If applicable, you will also see Sean's license number and expiration date.
                

                View Full Background Details
            






Photos & Social Posts


Photos









ViewPhotos





    Sean may have Photos - Check Full Background Report to see possible pictures and photo albums found from social and public sources.
                

                View Full Background Details
            







Social Posts





View Social Posts



    We did not find any Social Posts records after searching multiple government records, social and public sources. As part of your premium service, we will continue to search and notify you when we find new information.



    Sean may have hidden Social Profiles & Photos - Check Full Background Report to see Sean's social media activity. This may contain online profiles, dating websites, forgotten social media accounts, and other potentially embarrassing profiles. This may also contain additional contact information, giving you more ways to get in touch.
                





Reviews & Ratings





Sean Dcash's Reputation Score:
4.00/5



4.00

						        	
                                            (1 Review)
                                        







                                    Rate:
                                    
                                        Sean










Improve my Rating
                                            |  
                                             Ask others to Rate
                                            |  
                                            Write a Review




Ranking:  Compared to U.S. Population




BAD
POOR
FAIR
GOOD

















Jeffrey Tinsley, CEO & Founder of Mylife.com

Personal Review









Reply










×
Showing balanced reviews improves the credibility of your positive reviews, so consider keeping them.Are you sure you want to delete this comment?
Yes
No








×
Your request has been sent.
Close









        Court & Arrest Records
        
            
            
                
            
        
    


Arrest and Criminal Records




    Sean may have Arrest and Criminal Records - Check Full Background Report to see possible arrest or conviction records we have found on Sean. This may include any DUIs, traffic tickets and outstanding warrants. When applicable, we may show where the crime occurred and provide details about the offense.


                View Full Background Details
            





Sex Offender Status




    Sean may have Sexual Offenses - Check Full Background Report to see a complete list of any and all sex offenses Sean may have been convicted of and his current sex offender status if applicable.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





Lawsuits, Liens & Bankruptcies




    Sean may have Lawsuits, Liens & Bankruptcies - Check Full Background Report to see local, state and federal court documents, sensitive legal information and any litigation that Sean may have been involved in.  We'll reveal arrest details like case numbers, offense descriptions, and booking dates, where available.
                

                View Full Background Details
            







Family & Friends


Relatives/Associates




    Sean may have a record of Relatives/Associates - Check Full Background Report to see possible family members, friends, co-workers, and associates found from multiple government records, social and public sources.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





Classmates




    Sean may have a record of associated Classmates - Check Full Background Report to see possible who they are and full classlists  found from school records and public sources.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





Neighborhood Information | Information based on current address








Age








Education Level










Household Income








Estimated Home Values










Top Buying Habits








Top Interests & Hobbies



















A Full Background Report Includes



Find Background Profiles & Reputation Scores for Everyone in the U.S.



                            MyLife searches government, social & public sources to pull together all details in one place
                        




                            Contact details include addresses, email, phone numbers, photos & social profiles and more
                        




                            Background checks include arrest & court records, education & work history, personal reviews and more to asses anyone's reputation
                        



Only MyLife Helps You Improve Your Background Report & Reputation Score



                            Edit & correct your own Background Report to look your best to employers, clients, friends, dates & others searching for you on Google.
                        




                            Ask friends, family, employers & clients to review you to improve your public Reputation Score.
                        




                            Remove your information from sites you can't control to protect your privacy
                        



See What MyLife Customers Are Saying

                        "When considering new tenants, you should always
                        check and verify their background to feel secure
                        & protected. MyLife makes it easy"
                    


- Ron W.




 







Back to Top




















×
Send Message


Message sent
An error has occurred, please try again later...


How do you know this person?

Please select (used to notify recipient)
Unknown
College
High School
Junior High School
Grade School
Met on MyLife.com
Is My Friend
Related to Me
Mutual Friend
Work
Club or Organization
Religion Affiliation
Not Sure
Don't Know Them
Found You Through a Dating Service
Found Your Service



Subject



Message




 Add/Track Contact
							







SEND NOW

















×


					Your message has been sent.
				











×
Help Sean build his reputation & public image 
Thank you for rating Sean Dcash
Please provide additional details to give people more insight into Sean's reputation. 



Sorry! We were unable to submit your review


                                        Please select at least one quality
                                    




Does Sean have these qualities?
Deselect all







Personal
Professional
Dating





 Smart
 Loyal
 Honest
 Good listener
 Humble
 Generous
 Fun
 Easy going
 Optimistic
 Kind
I would NOT be friends with Sean
 I would be friends

Is there anything you want to say about him on a personal level?
  (Optional)




 Responsible
 Hardworking
 Intelligent
 Collaborative
 Creative
 Resourceful
 Motivated
 Flexible
 Ambitious
 Articulate
I would NOT work with Sean

Is there anything you want to say about him on a professional level?
  (Optional)




 Faithful
 Respectful
 Understanding
 Funny
 Romantic
 Sexy
 Smart
 Passionate
 Good looking
 Good listener
 I would NOT date Sean

Is there anything you want to say about him concerning dating?
  (Optional)




You are responsible for your submissions, which must be true, lawful and not violate any person's rights. You agree to our User Agreement.







How do you know Sean?*

Friends
                                          Friend
Professional
Dating
Family Member
Neighbor
School
Club or Organization
Religious
Myself
Not Sure
Don't Know Them
Other







    Post anonymously
?






















































POST REVIEW








×

                        
                                Two Ways to Improve your Score
                            




Correct and Edit your extended background details
Correct & Edit


Ask Family & Friends  for positive reviews
  Send an Email
Share on Facebook










×





























×





Search to Find Background Reports & Publicly Exposed Personal Details on Anyone including Yourself.
Are You Sean Dcash?


YES
See & control your exposed background info
See, Monitor & Enhance Your Background Report that People are Viewing.


NO
See public background info on  Sean 
See Background Report to Learn  the Truth about Sean .











×





Thank you. We received your vote.











×






GET AN ADDITIONAL PREMIUM REPORT ON Sean Dcash
Premium data contains highly sensitive  info such as:

Arrest Records
Wealth & Assets
Lawsuits & Liens
Licenses & Permits
Sexual Offenses
Corp. Affiliations




                            In order to access the sensitive info on a Premium Report today, an additional fee is required. Remember, you do not need to purchase a Premium Report to access the info that is available in Standard Reports.
                        
BUY PREMIUM REPORT FOR  
No, thank you




THANK YOU FOR YOUR PURCHASE
Your Premium Report is now Ready
CLICK HERE TO SEE REPORT




There is a problem authorizing your charge on this card. Please try your card again or try another card.























Credit Card No.






Expiry Date

MM
01
02
03
04
05
06
07
08
09
10
11
12


Year

                                                        2017

                                                        2018

                                                        2019

                                                        2020

                                                        2021

                                                        2022

                                                        2023

                                                        2024

                                                        2025

                                                        2026

                                                        2027

                                                        2028

                                                        2029

                                                        2030

                                                        2031

                                                        2032

                                                        2033




CVC 









BUY PREMIUM REPORT FOR  
















×
You now have access to view Sean Dcash's Premium Background Report.

The information in this report is gathered from Government, Social & Public Records gathered from across the web.

                                    Access Sean's Premium Background Report
                                    









×
MyLife Protects & Builds Your Reputation


MyLife gathers up-to-date Government, Social & Public Records so you know what's public everywhere online and help you build your reputation for employers, friends and others that search for you here and on Google.
We recommended you:

Edit & Correct Your Background Report
Complete Your Profile Providing Positive Details
Ask Friends for Positive Reviews
See Who's Checking Your Background
Remove Unwanted Records You Can't Control










×
Review posted! Register to get reply alerts



New to MyLife? Register today for FREE.

Already a member?  Log in







































Name




Email

We respect your privacy


Message


Register to send your email

Gender

                                I am
                                Male
Female



Birthday


MM
01
02
03
04
05
06
07
08
09
10
11
12




DD




YYYY


Must be 13 years or older to join


ZIP Code



Password



Confirm Password




FIND MY PAGE

By clicking on the button above, you agree to our User Agreement & Privacy Policy




See & Monitor All Background Info That's Public On AnyoneWe'll show you all background information, personal reviews and other details from government records and proprietary sources across the web, plus alert you to changes.
Edit and Add-To Your Background Info, Personal Reviews and Social PostsControl your public details to look good to employers, clients, friends and anyone who finds you online.
Send Messages To Get In Touch With AnyoneGet complete contact info on anyone. Send unlimited messages to make valuable professional and personal contacts.












×





Sign up for FREE. See detailed background info for Sean Dcash











































                                        Already a member? Log in

























VIEW FULL DETAILS




                                       By clicking on the button above, you agree to our User Agreement &  Privacy Policy




*Must be 13 years or older to join






Monitor Your Personal Info & Background Report that's Public Make sure it's accurate.
Edit Your Background Info & Personal ReviewsViewed by employers, clients, friends, or anyone
See Who's Searching for You ® Employers, friends, lovers, stalkers and others are looking for you.
Remove Private Information that's Exposed Stop sites from selling your private details online.
Send Message to Anyone Get complete contact info on anyone, make valuable professional and personal contacts.


Send Message to Anyone Get complete contact info on anyone, make valuable professional and personal contacts.
Monitor Your Personal Info & Background Report that's Public Make sure it's accurate.
Edit Your Background Info & Personal ReviewsViewed by employers, clients, friends, or anyone
See Who's Searching for You ® Employers, friends, lovers, stalkers and others are looking for you.
Remove Private Information that's Exposed Stop sites from selling your private details online.












�
Send a message to  Sean



Compose your message





































Your name




From



Message




SEND YOUR MESSAGE

By clicking on the button above, you agree to our User Agreement & Privacy Policy









×





Sign up for FREE. See detailed background info for Sean Dcash











































                                        Already a member? Log in

























VIEW FULL DETAILS




                                       By clicking on the button above, you agree to our User Agreement &  Privacy Policy




*Must be 13 years or older to join






Monitor Your Personal Info & Background Report that's Public Make sure it's accurate.
Edit Your Background Info & Personal ReviewsViewed by employers, clients, friends, or anyone
See Who's Searching for You ® Employers, friends, lovers, stalkers and others are looking for you.
Remove Private Information that's Exposed Stop sites from selling your private details online.
Send Message to Anyone Get complete contact info on anyone, make valuable professional and personal contacts.


Send Message to Anyone Get complete contact info on anyone, make valuable professional and personal contacts.
Monitor Your Personal Info & Background Report that's Public Make sure it's accurate.
Edit Your Background Info & Personal ReviewsViewed by employers, clients, friends, or anyone
See Who's Searching for You ® Employers, friends, lovers, stalkers and others are looking for you.
Remove Private Information that's Exposed Stop sites from selling your private details online.












Find Anyone:

Find Anyone:
A|
B|
C|
D|
E|
F|
G|
H|
I|
J|
K|
L|
M|
N|
O|
P|
Q|
R|
S|
T|
U|
V|
W|
X|
Y|
Z







COMPANY
About Us
Testimonials
Press
Careers
Contact Us
Blog
FAQs




SERVICES
Monitor Your Identity
Remove Your Public Profiles
Background Check
See Who's Searching for You
Connect with Friends & Find People
Manage Your Membership




DIRECTORIES
People Search




Visit us on:












                Copyright © Thu Jul 27 19:01:14 PDT 2017 MyLife.com®, Inc. |
User Agreement |
Privacy Policy
U.S. Patent No. 6,701,348 and 6,694,353








	            * The other websites referenced on this site are owned and operated by their respective companies, and the associated trademarks and logos are the property of those companies. Links are provided for reference only and MyLife.com® does not imply any connection or relationship between MyLife.com® and these companies.
	        



 










Cash Buyers List - Flip2Freedom.com





























































The Ultimate Real Estate Investing Podcast | Flip2Freedom.com


Real Estate Investing Podcast








F2F 126: INSTANT Cash Buyers List Made $162,000 in 2015 » Anthony Price
by Sean Terry on Feb 3, 2016  | Posted in: Real Estate Investing Podcast
Welcome, friends, to my podcast series that’s all about wholesaling houses… flipping houses using no cash, no credit. Yep, it most definitely can be done!
In this episode, we’re talking with a guy who has worked hard and made super-smart decisions to be successful in REI. From barely making end’s meet, he’s powered through the St. Louis market and is killing it as a full-time investor doing co-wholesale and wholesale deals.
You’ll hear his truly inspiring story of how he got to where he is today – through marketing and networking. But best of all – he’ll share with us how you can basically build a buyer’s list almost overnight. Seriously, this strategy he tells us about blew my mind. This idea is gold, friends.
Listen and enjoy
Download Episode 126 Here…
What you’ll learn

Specific things that Anthony implemented to increase his revenue so dramatically
How Anthony structures his co-wholesale deals
The surprisingly brilliant resource Anthony uses to build his cash buyer’s list that Sean never even thought about
Who Anthony reached out to to learn the ropes of REI and how he found that person
The conversion rate when Anthony sends a contract while still on the phone with the seller
Key things that have enabled Anthony to get the sellers to agree to the deal when he’s at the appointment with them
When and how to use REI education to your highest and best advantage

Mentioned in this episode


Sean’s updated site and book and register for his webinar: Register for the Webinar Here
Anthony’s REI site: St. L Wholesale Deals
Meet Up

Want a 30 day risk-free trial of Flip2Freedom Academy?
Tweetables


Constantly and consistently market with direct mail in multiple ways and various types of mailings
Click To Tweet




Keep your buyer’s list fresh b/c they’ll fall off every now and then. Always be updating your list
Click To Tweet




I answer calls Sunday to Sunday. There’s no break. If you don’t answer the call, the deal could go
Click To Tweet


Transcription:
Download episode transcript in PDF format here…

Intro:   Welcome to the Flip2Freedom Podcast, I am your host Sean Terry.
Sean:    Hello again, this is Sean Terry from the Flip2Freedom Podcast. And we are on episode number 126, and holy cow I got an amazing interview for you from a guy name Anthony Price out of St. Louis. And he drops one of the most ninja bombs that I have ever heard of doing this for close to 12 to 13 years on how to build a buyers list almost overnight. It’s amazing.
All right, Sean Terry here back with another awesome interview with the man out of St. Louis killing it, Anthony Price. What is up, Anthony?
Anthony:   Hey, what’s going on everybody?
Sean:    So you’re online with thousands of people listening to you right now and I love to have these…
Anthony:   Don’t say that.
Sean:    Well, I would love to have these stories because it truly inspires because a lot of people they might hear from me or like we’re just talking about Joe McCall or some of these other people on the podcast and they go, “That’s them but what about the guy that had a job a couple of years ago and got started and had some struggles and how are they doing?” So this you’re like the perfect example from I know in a competitive market but then it’s just killing it, so how you’re doing?
Anthony:   Doing great, Sean. The New Year and everything rock and rolling and the marketing now this and that, getting my system, building my streamline than what they were last year, just tweaking things. I have been doing it for a couple of years now. So now I am in a mode of getting more marketing out there, getting more leads coming and just tweaking everything like crazy, just streamline and make a little bit easier.
Sean:    Cool, cool, all right, so let’s talk about the results. I want to start doing this now in our podcast. We talk about specific results, then we can dive into those results and so people can take actionable things from the podcast so they can apply that helps you succeed. So the results are revenue. What did you do for revenue in 2015?
Anthony:   Yeah, so I finished year out $162,000 that year.
Sean:    Okay, so $162,000 in 2015 which is killer. Now let’s go back in what did you make in 2014 if you remember?
Anthony:   Oh man, $60,000 I think.
Sean:    So you increased your revenue by $100,000 in 2015 wholesaling. Is this your full-time gig or do you have another job or this is it?
Anthony:   No, this is it. It’s all or nothing now.
Sean:    Boom, okay. So now if you look back in 2015, right, what are like two or three the major shifts that you made in 2015 to increase your income $100,000 in that year? So if you look back at where you were, let’s say a year ago, and if you could try to pinpoint two or three different things you did in 2015 that have increased your revenue, what would you say those be?
Anthony:   So when I very first got started, I made $60,000 just doing co-wholesales. So in 2015, I actually started doing my own marketing, so I was doing direct mail, I was doing bandit signs, a little bit of Google Ad Words here and there. Yeah, I would just say mostly it’s just constantly and consistently just doing direct mail and getting that out there. I mean different with not just one but multiple ways and different types of mailings.
Sean:    Okay, so in 2014, you did $60 grand without marketing. Is that what you are saying?
Anthony:   Right, yeah, I did all with just wholesaling. I was always really good at selling properties. I had a big buyers list already, so I had already had buyers, so when I asked them to co-wholesale in a known market and if they need help, and luckily they did and made $60 grand just helping them with all their deals and it was really easy.
Sean:    Wow, okay, so for people that doesn’t know what co- wholesaling is, what is co-wholesaling?
Anthony:   So you talk to a wholesaler, they already have the property under contract. And then you just find the buyer for that property and you just split the commission. You split the final P or the double closing. You just put it 50-50 and that’s it. You bring them buyers, they got the deal and you close on it.
Sean:    Wow, okay so the cool thing is there’s no marketing upfront involved, unless marketing a few buyers list. You build a relationship with other wholesalers and you sign some sort of contract with them an option with them. What do you do?
Anthony:   Yeah, we did it an auction from real great friends of mine that I trusted. They closed on it and they would give me like a marketing fee or something like that on the side to the title company and the title company would come here and check directly.
Sean:    Right, right okay cool. All right, so that’s co-wholesaling and up to $60,000 in revenue. So now the question becomes your buyers list. How did you get such big buyer’s list?
Anthony:   Well, when I first got started, I was apprenticing and bird dogging for another investor here in the St. Louis area. And so I was constantly now selling his property that he would get off the courthouse bet in the MLS. I didn’t know the first thing about finding deals so he would get the deal and I would just sell them. I would get on sites like Meetup.com which is a huge advantage for people that don’t have a buyers list because there’s already a pre-made buyers list ready to go. You just join the local REIA meet-up. And then we had the mailing list in there that we can mail to the whole group. And I send the property out that way and get it sold pretty quickly, so I got really good at doing that.
Sean:     Very smart.
Anthony:   Yeah, I would also do direct mail to buyers, people that have bought a property in the last 3 months, paid cash. I would do a little bit of direct mail to those people, and then just word of mouth, networking and stuff like that.
Sean:    I like that, so meet-ups, that’s a first time I have heard that one where actually building a buyer’s list, so explain that a little bit more in detail how you did that.
Anthony:   Oh, and I still do it to this day so I get on there. You just go to MeetUp.com; you need an account, type of real estate. And it brings up all these real estate groups in your market and I just joined the bigger ones there. So what I would do is go in there, I will say, “Hey, anybody looking for wholesale properties in this area? I get great rental wholesales all the time. I get rehab deals all the time. Go to this website which would be my squeeze page, it will direct to my squeeze page.
They will sign up, doing that on my buyers list and stuff like that. So I’ll send a… And I have got about 5 MeetUp groups in my market that are big in size. I will go in there once a month, send that out, get some new buyers, fresh buyers. You always want to keep your list fresh because buyers going to die out every now and then. They pull up their inventory and it kind of fall off and that so I always try to refresh my buyers list no matter what. If I do that, just market then, tell them where my squeeze page is and sign up that way.
Sean:    Okay, so you would actually go into the MeetUp, join the meet-up in the comment section where make a comment. So you comment and in that comment would go to everybody in that group, is that correct?
Anthony:   I do that. That’s called the discussion board where you can actually post the discussion. And I do that too but a lot of people don’t like to take the time going there, clicking on it. It comes through the discussion board and look at your post, whereas I go in there. And some meetups actually have an email link that you can copy and paste to your sent email where it will actually e-mail out to everybody in that group, so it’ll hit their email directly versus them having to login themselves to MeetUp, go to this discussion board, and some series of things and hopefully they will see your ad, whereas I actually email out to the entire group and it will email everybody in that group. And so that is a good way of making sure they actually get it and they see it, and the opportunity to go to my page and sign up for the wholesale properties. Or if I had a property I am trying to sell off, also send it out on MeetUp. That way, it goes to everybody in that real estate group. There are always buyers in real estate groups looking for dealers so it worked out well.
Sean:    And so this link, this e-mail link, is it pulled out of MeetUp, and then you put it in your own platform like your mail, like Outlook or is it something that you do inside of? So they have this mail link inside of MeetUp that you can capture, copy and paste the link, put it in your Outlook for an example. And then send out a particular property or dealer something like that?
Anthony:   Correct, yes. So you just go to like… like right now I am on it. You just click on whatever group you’re in. I click on discussions tab and will drop down a message board or mailing list and it says email the mailing list at. And then it’s like for this one, it says The Spirit of St. Louis Real Estate Club List@Meetup.com. So you just copy and paste that into your email whatever you use provider. I use Outlook. And I just put that and send it to… there’s 372 people in this list, so it will send it to 372 pre-made buyers for you.
Sean:    Hey, Anthony.
Anthony:   What?
Sean:    Can I just tell you something?
Anthony:   Yeah.
Sean:    That’s brilliant! That is brilliant, that is gold dude, that is absolutely brilliant, brilliant, brilliant, brilliant.
Anthony:   Yeah, so I mean that’s just the way I had a… When you’re not bringing deals, and the only way I can use money back in the day was to sell property. I had to get really good at selling properties and finding buyers. And so that is just one of the things I always did and that was only an example, 372 buyers in this one group. I mean there are groups out there; there are another couple of groups. I mean they had thousands of buyers for you that are free, that maybe want to be on your direct buyers list. Whenever I had a property, like I said, I always get out there and I blast it on those Meetups and put it on Postlets and that seems everything else. But MeetUp is definitely a good tool that you have to use.
Sean:    That is one of the smartest, slickest things I have heard in a very, very long time dude. That is ninja, ninja, ninja, ninja. I am telling you, people are listening right now and they’re freaking out. I can feel that they’re going, “Oh, my God, it’s incredible!” so that is a… And I’ve been doing this for a long time and we have… I mean I have a MeetUp group, so we have 80 to 100 wholesalers come into my office every single month and stuff like that. But I know that we can e-mail through the platform out to them but I have never heard that before.
But think about the genius of that, right? Not only you can tap into buyers locally to the big REIA groups and stuff like that, but also to other wholesalers where you can send out something saying, “Hey if you wholesalers are out there, I have got a huge list, if you are looking to sell your properties, bring them here, I can help you out.” I mean, not only can it help you in your co-wholesaling business, but it can help you to sell proprieties too. Again that is a brilliant piece of gold nugget right there that you just brought. That’s awesome dude.
Anthony:   Definitely, definitely, yeah.
Sean:    Okay, so I have… We got to go back. I haven’t asked you about prior to real estate. How did you get into real estate?
Anthony:   Oh man, yeah, so I had the worst lot back in the day when I was younger, getting laid off from jobs here and there. I was in the healthcare for a long time as a nurse assistant. And I thought I wanted to be in healthcare, and so I figured that will be okay to always have a job. But I guess back in the days, it’s just… I just always had bad luck getting laid off. So like 2012, I got laid off again from a warehouse job making $12,000 a year just sitting at my computer. And I just, “I got to do something. I got to do something. I can’t keep doing this. I’m getting older. I wanted actually to have a life. I wanted to be able to do things.”
Sean:    Right.
Anthony:   And so, I was sitting on my computer and I was like, “Well, one of my family members said to me, ‘You always talk about doing real estate. How about you be a real estate agent?'” So I said, “Okay, we’ll get on YouTube and kind of see what it takes to be that. So I got on there, started Googling how to do that and on the right side of the screen and I think it was you. I can’t quite remember but I think it was Sean Terry himself on the side of the screen with some video saying something crazy like, “Make $10,000 in a week or seven days or 30 days or something like that.”
And I was like, “That’s crap, that’s never going to work’. I’m a big skeptic of all that. And I clicked on it, so thank God I clicked on it, because from there I watched all your videos on YouTube and all these great content that you had and it really helped out. I mean you were just so simple about explaining everything. I just… I was watching everything and I think about two months solid I would get up at 7:00 in the morning, sit on the computer and watch every single video and listen to every single podcast at 7:00 to 8:00 in the morning to 10:00 at night.
And I get up and I did that for two months because they told me it took everybody that long to do that. I am very analytical, I got to read everything and watch everything before I actually take action, which is just the kind of person I am. So after doing that, I got started, I contacted every big investor in St. Louis just by typing ‘We Buy Houses,” and I send them an e-mail saying, “Hey, do you need an apprentice? I need to get started, I will help you find properties; just teach me how to do this. I’m hands-on; I’ll help you find deals quickly.” One guy got back to me and that’s how I started. So I was able to move back to St. Louis and get started doing that. So I thank God it all worked out and thank God I saw your video that day.
Sean:    That’s awesome and you got still.
Anthony:   I could have been a real estate agent right now so I am glad I’m on the other
half.
Sean:    Yeah, it’s funny, when I got started my wife said, “You got to be a real estate agent,” so I bought all the books of real estate agents, started studying, and I was like, “It just did not feel right for me. I didn’t really want to be an agent.” Nothing against agents because my wife is actually a real estate agent herself, and for her she loves the hunt and helping people find a house. For me, it just didn’t work for me, so I am glad I kind of tripped into the investing arena. It’s lot more fun, lot more money.
Anthony:   Yeah, yeah, and I am definitely glad I found something that I can build and something that I control, not somebody that is telling me when to I can go on break, or when I can go and use the restroom or when I can do this, when can I see my family or what holidays can I have off. It’s something that I can do, I can build and it’s my life.
Sean:    That’s killer. Okay, so now let’s go back to beginning 2015 and let’s talk about the things you did different in 2015 to increase your revenue by $100,000. So you said you did direct mail. And so let’s talk about the… What do you believe is like your top-performing list in 2015?
Anthony:   So in 2015, I made a goal to be more consistent, just with my thinking because I had to be more consistent. I was kind of, “If I make some money here, that would be great,” and then I would be broke again. You know what I mean? I do a deal then two months later I hadn’t done anything and then I’ll do another one. So I just finally said, “Screw them. I’ll put all my money together. I’m just going to start every quarter, everything in the quarter, I’m listing one, big campaign and do it that way.
So I was like, “Okay, every quarter was a big campaign,” so I did absentee owners with equity. So I did absentee owners with equity which was obviously… I mean that’s my biggest producer here in my area. I also did owner-occupied houses with high equity, and then I had messed around with some smaller ones like probate, divorce, noted some people. They didn’t really produce in my area like I was hoping to, like I can concentrate on the things that are actually worked – absentee owners and stuff like that. And then also bandit signs, trying to get those out there every weekend and stuff like that.
Sean:    Cool, cool. Okay, and then would you primarily send a postcard, would you send a letter or would you send a yellow letter? What do you do?
Anthony:   I did postcard just so I can reach more people with less money… That’s kind of how I did it first. I have always done postcards, which is what I love the ability to just hit on a huge amount of people versus yellow letters. It costs a little bit more; I’m sure the return rate is a lot better but this way we can get more people consistently or I mean I guess more.
Sean:    More broader reach…
Anthony:    With a budget. Yeah, with the budget that I was on, I can hit him more repetitive than I could with yellow letters costing me $0.70 apiece versus the postcards cost like $0.38 apiece so that’s why I chose that route.
Sean:    Right. And then what about frequency? So you got a list, let’s say you have theoretically less than 20,000, what would be your frequency on that list?
Anthony:    Well, in 2015, I was doing like a big list like that once in quarter. So once a quarter I would get on that, get on whatever site. I was using the mail one out and I would do like 20,000 mailers. And so I would take that and I would break that 20,000 down into like 4 to 8 campaigns where they go out once every week or once every two weeks, something like that, to where I had it at like a 1,000 or 2,000 hitting every week until the whole 20,000 was gone. In that way, one advantage is it doesn’t overwhelm me. You don’t have 20,000 hitting at one time. You will run around like, “Oh, my God!” and, “What’s going on?” and stuff like that, so that is a lot easier. Still pretty hectic but it made it a lot better to handle the volume that I was doing at that time and…
Sean:    So it’s manageable, you can manage it. And so you’re essentially hitting that list 4 times a year, which is good. Okay, and then so you answered all the calls and what is your like weekly schedule look like? Did you like answer calls on Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday or did you set up appointments for Wednesday, Thursday? How is your week like?
Anthony:   I answered calls Sunday through Sunday, Sean. I mean there is no break when you buy yourself. I mean if you don’t answer that call, maybe a deal has been out lot on that deal and here’s a small big city. It’s pretty competitive in direct mail. Usually a seller will call me and they’re like, “Yeah, I will get nine of these. I’m just calling down the list. And I’m seeing what your office is.” That’s the typical call I get. So I mean, if you have to be really aggressive, once you get a call and they seem motivated and then they’re within your range, I mean either I am e-mailing the contract right on the phone.
“Hey, I’m selling this unless you sign and get it back to me and we will get everything going on it,” or I’m out there trying to meet him as soon as possible. So I mean I didn’t have a set schedule: Monday, Wednesday, Friday: answering phones; Tuesday, Thursday: I am out looking at properties. It looks like Monday I’m looking, I’m answering calls. If a person calls me and I need to see the house, I’m also going out there that Monday same day and seeing the house so I can get that deal, so I can have both my business and everything else.
Sean:    That’s called hustle. That’s the way. Well, people in the real estate, turn your phone off on Saturday and Sundays and stuff like that. And when you hustle, I mean think about $162,000 a year not… I mean that’s less than 5% of the population ever make that money. And then those guys make $30, $40,000 a year goes, “Do I really have to work on weekends?” I was like, “Really? It’s your business. You’re hustling man. You’re blowing it up.” If you get calls coming in on Sunday at 4:00 and you know it’s a deal, get on it, right? So…
Anthony:    Right. Yeah, and I just still feel guilty sitting there on Saturday and say I got four calls waiting for me. I can’t sit there and try to enjoy my day, because I’m thinking, “Oh man, that’s a $20,000 deal right there.” But if somebody’s there talking with somebody else on the phone, I need to be on the on the phone right now calling back to see what’s going on. If it’s nothing, it is nothing but if it’s a deal… And yeah there were times that I did that on a Saturday night or Sunday morning or Sunday night and it was a deal like $8,000 or something like that on the whole deal that I could have potentially missed out on because I was like, “Yeah, I already told Tuesday to make an appointment with the man.”
Sean:    Yeah, and that separates someone that is average, that someone is above average, taking that extra step. And I can’t do it either; I mean we must be coming from the same class because I can’t. If I know like… For example, this morning at 7:00, a deal came in and I knew it was a smoking deal. They wanted $50,000 for property; the stuff in there is going for $150. So I immediately sent it over to Jerri Beth and Rafael. And Rafael, that’s his territory. It says, “Listen.” I said, “Call these guys ASAP and set an appointment. It is a smoking deal,” and I give him like 10 minutes to respond back but Rafael responded back less than 5 minutes.
He said, “Okay, I’ll get him on the phone, talk to him, get appointment set today for 2:00.” So it’s that type of hustle that it takes this business because as the marketing increases, the inventory decreases. It becomes a seller’s market. Sellers have now options if they have options and someone is picking his nose and they get… Saturday night they get a lead that comes in and they’re not going to come until Monday afternoon or Monday morning, guess what? You’ve already been to the house and you already got the deal under contract before they even wake up on Monday morning so…
Anthony:   Yeah, yeah, exactly.
Sean:    That’s awesome. Okay, so you said that you sometimes when you’re talking to them on the phone, you get a contract over to them ASAP. How has that been working for conversions for you?
Anthony:    Well, usually, if I get to the point where I say, “Hey, I’m going to e-mail you this contract,” it’s pretty much a 90% conversion just because if I feel that I can send the contract to him right now and they’re going to sign it. And then yeah I’m going to definitely make that effort and get that typed as quick as possible and e-mail it over to him. And let them know that, “Hey, this is coming in your inbox here in five minutes. Take a look at it. If you have any questions about it, please give me call. You have my number and we will walk through it with you if need be.
And then once you sign that, give that back to me. I love to meet you out at this property just to do a quick walk through to make sure there’s no big issue going on. And then if not, hey, we’re going to get this over to the title company here and they will get it closed as soon as possible for you.” And usually, like I said, if they’re that motivated where I can send them a contract like that, it’s usually 90, 95% conversion because they’re like, “Yeah, yeah, send them over,” I take a look at it. We’ll sign it, and then we’ll e-mail it back to you or we will meet you at the property with the contract, something like that.
Sean:    Right, so you eliminate that entire, “Okay, well, let’s set an appointment.” Then you meet him the next day and whatever like that. You just get the contract in the inbox ASAP.
Anthony:   Yeah, because I’ve lost them before and I am like, “I will meet you at the property.” And then I call back like may be an hour before the appointment the next day or something. And they’re, “Oh, I’m sorry,” and so and so because they met me yesterday or they met me this morning. I mean, I was about there this afternoon and they were already within my range, my price range. And it’s like, “Well, damn, if I would have been there, I would have just sent you the contract and you could have signed it and I could have met you today or something.” You know what I mean? Or something like that. So I just bring in the contract, “Hey, I’ll meet you there. After you sign it or just…” whatever maybe.
Sean:    Well, I mean it’s smart because if you… I mean the result that you want is to get the contract so every step in between that you can eliminate is your fastest path to actually getting the result you want. And if you can get him on the phone and get him to agree on a price and once you agree on a price, and then it just becomes a walkthrough situation then great. “Here’s the price, send the contract,” boom! And then you get it in, and then you pretty much eliminate everybody else from the equation.
Anthony:    Yeah, exactly, you can deal with issues if the house is on a contract. You can’t deal with issues if you don’t have it on a contract. You lost it, you lost the deal so if you can get under a contract, you have more, you can deal with things because now you safely have it under contract. You don’t have to worry about the money going in there and getting it from you because you have it.
Sean:    Right, another, another awesome, awesome tip. All right, so direct mail, postcard frequency about every quarter, and then what did you say your next best marketing campaign was?
Anthony:   I’m trying to just all direct and directly. I mean I try to hit that and hit that hard and hit it frequently. Yeah, like I said, owner-occupied high-equity absentee-owner but I had a couple of others and all of this going as well. I did Google Adwords kind of the half, the latter half year. It was okay, I don’t know what’s going on with it really if it’s just my market or what. But I had an actual people managing kind of manage it for me and keeping track of things. And it has been pretty competitive too online here I noticed.
I increased my budget on that, but they had already been producing kind of… It’s about thousands of dollars on average or not too much coming in so I had to pull that one down. Well, the stuff is where it works. My main thing towards for 2015 was stick to what works, and what not like cater off and do other crazy things like I keep on value packing things like that I blow off money on before and advertising on the back of every seat. So I still have done that before making thousands of dollars with no result. So I stuck with what works, what I know works and that would be in 2015 for me, just picking with what I know works and get me results.
Sean:    Yeah, and it’s… And I guess about mine is that I always tell people. I said like, “Pick a marketing campaign, whether it be Google Ad Words, whether it be direct mail, whether it be TV, radio, whatever the case may be. Once you find something that works and you have direct mail that works for you, then it just becomes maxing out that channel to the max. And then when you’re completely full throttle on that particular campaign. Then you can move to other campaigns and start testing.
You know what I mean? You can move to Google Ad Words. But the problem is a lot of people get in and they go, “Oh, my gosh. I got to do Google; I got to send out 3,000 postcards. And then I have got to do this and I have got to do that. And I have got to do this…” And they want to get all the lines in the ocean so they can have that, but if they just focus on one line and making that line with the best bait possible, maxing it out, guess what? You do more business, you’ll be more focused, and then you can start adding channels down the road.
In my situation right now, we are trying to grab leads from everywhere. We’re maxed out on pretty much every single channel that we tapped into. So now we are looking for more creative channels to tap into or different markets we can max out the channel so it’s like a different scenario. Three years from now, two years from now, a year from now when you’re making, doing $1 million, $2 million a year revenue and you’re going to be going, “Okay, where else can I market?” right. It’s like where else can I just drop in 100 and 150,000 mailers a month and you maxed out on Google, and you maxed out on everywhere in the newspapers and stuff like that, then you start looking for other different avenues.
But the exciting thing is the potential is there. You know what I mean? The reach is there. I mean it’s like you are driving in first gear and wait till you’re in fifth gear, and you are going 1,000 miles an hour, 100 miles an hour down the street. It’s exciting. Cool, cool, cool, all right. And that’s been awesome advice.
Now let’s talk about your actual appointment and what has been some key things for you at the particular appointments. So you meet with them, you go to their house and stuff, and you build the rapport with them, what has been key for you to actually getting the seller to sign the contract with you versus anybody else?
Anthony:   Yeah, sure, so being first involved and listening to the big thing, taking the time actually to listen instead of hear them, actually talk with them about the house, talk to them about the family, what’s going on, the stuff like that, that kind of open him up a little bit and don’t just get there and start throwing up things and there. “That needs to be fixed, that’s broken, that looks like crap over there, I don’t like this and I’ll be around $30,000.”
So you kind of want to be a little gentler than that, I have noticed, so that will help you out a lot. Explain the process, that’s another thing. I mean explain the process, it’s a lot. I mean it’s very helpful. You sit down at the kitchen table or you sit down on the couch and you just, “Hey, this is how it’s going to work. We’re going to look over this together. If you have any questions, you ask me, even when you sign it. You’re going to have my cell phone number, so give me a call anytime during the process. You’re also going to have the title company’s information. You are going to have their e-mail, their phone number, my e-mail, my phone number so if you have any questions during the process, you are going to be able to give me a call.”
And then also there’s a thousand ways we expect to close, and then you going to get cash at closing. You can send your finance or anything like that and we are going to handle everything. So you don’t need to fix anything, you don’t need to fix the kitchen or do this or that. And then also if you have any junk in the house, if you have an old couch or the basement is cluttered with old clothes or furniture and stuff like that, don’t worry about it, because a lot of sellers they’re kind of apprehensive I noticed about, “Well, I got all this stuff in the basement and I don’t know when I’m going to have the time or money to… I don’t know who or what kind of help I can get to get all the stuff out of the house.”
That has actually helped largely. “Leave anything in the house that you want to leave, take out that is all yours, but take anything. This is your property so take anything you want to take, the clothes or furniture that you want. And then anything that is junk, leave it behind. We’re going fix up the property anyway so we’re going to have it done starting here to throw away all the stuff for you and make it a lot easier for you. “Oh, okay. Well, that works, that’s really easy.” So we explain the process and how it works. It helps a lot and goes a long way.
Sean:    Well, what’s interesting about that and I’m glad you said that, because this business is in a robotic checklist of what to do when you meet with the seller. If a person on the other hand, they have issues, they have a story, they have problems, they have apprehensions, they don’t really know the process and the problem is that a lot of times we go in and especially if you’re going on multiple appointments a week, you tend to forget what a person they’re going through, but if you put yourself back and kind of put yourself and almost like have empathy, put yourself in their shoes and feel that, “Listen, they’re brand-new.
They don’t know the process. They don’t understand what’s going on and if you come from that standpoint, I can tell the way you talk and the way you just explain that is that you make someone very comfortable to do business with you and you answer a lot of the unknown questions which again makes people comfortable to do business with you, whereas someone else might come in and just walks you the house and look at the repairs you know not really get to know them or their situation of why they’re selling or the problem they can solve, throw some number out in the air. And then the seller goes, “Well, let me think about it,” and then they walk out of the house. So I think that is a key critical important knowing that this is a people business so…
Anthony:    Yeah, yeah, it definitely is. And it helps a lot.
Sean:    That’s pretty cool. Okay, now, from when you get your contract, so when you get it signed from your seller to actually selling the property and close it, do you have any idea what that time frame is?
Anthony:   My time frame on getting it closed?
Sean:    Yeah, so typically your average time frame. So to give some perspective, because so when you get it signed from a seller and you meet with them and you get it signed that day, and let’s say you know it’s on a Thursday whatever, Friday, Monday whatever. And then from the time you market it and you put it out to a buyer, and then the buyer is closing it. From the contract signing with the seller to actually closing and getting your check, you know what your average timeframe is?
Anthony:   I have been shooting for a week. I have been trying… That’s what I’ve really been trying to do for a while. Back in 2015, I was using a title company, and they were taking forever just to get the title work done. And it’s two weeks, three weeks to get the title working and this and that. And so I had to change it up, get a different title company that is a lot better, like they can give a title within a four-day period or something like that, a week. So I’ll try to get in, as soon as I get on the contract, I will put it up on my site. I will send it out to my buyers list, I will send it out on MeetUp, I will post it on Postlets, anything else that I can do. And then hopefully get under contract that day, and then get it aligned up to working easily within like a week and a half, kind of period, week or two weeks.
Sean:    Yeah, and I think that is incredibly important for the velocity of business and with the money, how the money flows, because if you can get a deal signed, and then turn around and get paid on it a week later, that means the marketing money is getting… Basically, you return up money ASAP and the profit where then you can reinvest back in the marketing and essentially do more deals, it accelerates that entire process from start to finish, and that’s how you can double and triple your income. So something interesting right now, and you’re taking 13 days, 15 days, 25 days to go from contract to close. Then that whole time frame, if you can cut that time frame down, it’s important. Now do you happen to know your KPI by any chance? And if you don’t, that’s okay because 99.9% of people don’t. I’m the kind of freak that does.
Anthony:   Yeah, yeah, no, I can’t say that I do too well.
Sean:    Right. And I think going into 2016, if you really dial in on those average contract value, your cost per lead and your leads per contract, if just those three KPIs, if you dial in those, it gives you a lever that you can push to increase that revenue and which I think is cool. All right, book. What is your favorite book?
Anthony:   I don’t really… I’m reading so many books right now. I’m kind of all over the place. Right now, I am reading the E-Myth for Real Estate Investors, the new book that came out by Michael Gerber and Than Merrill. I got that one going and it is a pretty interesting book. I have been liking that. I got another stuff; I am reading like 4-Hour Work Week, a lot of Rich Dad books like Cashflow Quadrant and stuff like that. A lot of those typical real estate books are kind of what I’m reading right now.
Sean:    Oh, it’s interesting, the E-Myth, it comes from the perspective of the operator. Since now that you’re… I think your transition from doing everything yourself to actually having a team, I think E-Myth is probably an incredibly important book for you along with I would recommend Traction. But then knowing those key… key-employees that you need like a lead manager that can answer a phone for you. And then find some that’s going to be an outside sales person, acquisition guy, and then disposition guy.
You’re just a handful of couple of hirers away from where you get in a position where you go, “Holy cow! This is amazing!” now you built the business, you understand the process, you know the objections, you understand what conversion rate and what it takes to make a revenue, now you can then turn around and teach and train other people to where now you build yourself that freedom to take it to the next level. And you sell like… You sound obviously a really smart guy and you can now do things in your business that will increase the marketing, become more efficient. And then take it from $160,000 a year to 160,000 a month, and that’s what it takes is building that team and being able to have an awesome team. And then the cool thing is making $160,000 a month and being in the Caribbean.
Anthony:   Yeah, that’s my next step. I will definitely do that. I am working on that. 2015 was just kind of get things in line and make sure it really works and kind of putting things a little bit more and use all of my systems and streamline everything to where I can grow the business and work on the business and get some stuff in place and make more revenue come in and things like that.
Sean:    Right. All right, so tell me about your family.
Anthony:   My family? Well, we’re all from mid-Missouri. I moved… I kind of moved in there. I’m getting a little bit of too much family here in the city. I got some family over in Illinois. The side of things just got a little reverted but…
Sean:    So are you married with kids?
Anthony:   Family, family.
Sean:    Family, family, so are married with kids or just single?
Anthony:    Oh no, I’m newly engaged. I will be getting married this fall so I’m busy doing that. Yeah, I’m busy doing that as well this year. Things gone that and stuff like that. Luckily, my fiancée, she has been very helpful with training and getting stuff online, so I can help out when I can, but I also focus on other things to get this up and going. So that way, we can hopefully retire at early age and have fun and be on that Caribbean Island and making you six figures a month and enjoy life instead of working 40 hours or 80 hours a week or whatever maybe and stuff like that so.
Sean:    Right. And so, okay now, how old are you?
Anthony:    29. I’ll be 30 this July.
Sean:    Sweet! 30 years old. That’s young man. Of what you got going on at that young of age, do you have any idea 10-15 years from now you are going to own the world?
Anthony:   Yeah, I think about that from time to time. It’s quite when you guy started yourself, Sean, back in 2002, and where you are, and then 10 years later then look at you. I kind of sometimes just in my office kind of think like, “Wow, I’ve been doing this for three years, what is going to be like in five? What’s it going to be like in ten? If I did $152,000 in my second or third year, what’s my tenth year going to look like?” It’s just crazy to see the possibilities with it.
Sean:    It’s insane, it’s insane. Your brain can’t actually even function. I mean it’s like you go, “Okay, $1.5 million parable, what would happen if I win that?” It’s like you’re ranging the key as fast and whatever. Okay, and then lastly, what would be one piece of advice you give someone that is new there and thinking about getting started. They kind of don’t know about it and they kind of on that fence and they hear you and you have been doing it for three years. You have had this success, got some great tips and stuff. What would be some good advice there for someone that can push him over the edge?
Anthony:   To get started in wholesaling?
Sean:    Yeah, so they’re brand new, they maybe never done a deal before or they maybe they have done one or two deals. What is some great advice you could give them that if you put yourself back, back then when you are first getting started and you are still trying to find your way what would you tell?
Anthony:   Yeah, so first I would learn what the system, like how to actually get things done. If you don’t know that and obviously you’re not going to know how to get it done and how to get that check at the end of the day. Like I started listening to the Flip2Freedom podcast. That way, you understand how the contract works, how talking to sellers work, how talking to buyers work, how they interact with the title company, how to interact with just things that happen on that daily basis, getting the deal on the contract and then following the deals. So that’s kind of what I called education, and that’s the time I saw that video that day on YouTube, and I watched everything that I could.
And then I was able to… I kind of knew how to get started. And so my next action was, “Okay, well, now I need to call sellers,” so I got on and that is how I got my first deal. I just called people on for sale by owner and started talking to them until I got a guy I’m on and that was that. I was able to get the contract, and then get that to the title company, and then find a buyer and got my first check. So just education, find something to follow, find something to learn the process. For me, it was here Sean Terry and stuff, so thank you for that, Sean. I owe everything to you buddy.
Sean:    That’s awesome man. And I think that’s great advice because I think education puts you in the fear… gets you over the fear of the unknown. But you did two different things, not only did you educate yourself, but then also you took massive action to go out and get that result. A lot of people go into this education mode and they just go from… That’s all they do is educate themselves but they never take action. And that’s the important thing where you learned about something and then you went applied it. And it’s almost like it’s like the education is there that will bring you to the next step, so now when it comes to talking to sellers, well, the next step is then, well, what do you do at the appointment?
   Well then, you can educate yourself prior to going the appointment, then you go in the appointment. So it’s that the education shows up or is… I would rather have someone get educated while taking action instead of just going through everything, getting fully educated, and then now forgetting the steps. It becomes more… For me, I guess at least it’s when I’m applying as I’m being educated, the results come a lot quicker and I need to know what I need to know when I need to know instead of knowing everything, and then forgetting it as I go through the process which is cool.
Anthony:   Definitely. I still listen to all your podcast today and all your videos and cooking art and stuff like that, so you always going to continue the education. I just listened to your other podcast that came up just the other day on getting your mind right for the New Year and staying in focus, involved with the traction and stuff like that so it was really good.
Sean:    That’s awesome! Well, congratulations, Anthony. I’m so excited for you. You have done phenomenal things. Thank you for sharing all your great information and congratulations to you and your new fiancée. And I see you guys are going to get married and that’s going to be awesome. Go on a killer vacation, have a blast and enjoy yourself and don’t feel too guilty. And that’s the cool thing is as a solopreneur, you kind of get that guilty feeling because you’re not on that hustle. But I can just tell you, once you have a team built and that guilt feeling does go away and it’s a very… It’s a peaceful relaxing type of sensation so I look forward to seeing your progress and then have you come back on the show maybe at the end 2016 to see how that implementations happened so congratulations.
Anthony:   Definitely. Thank you very much, Sean. Thank you.
Sean:    All right guys, we are going to sign off here and thank you so much. All right, now that was an incredible interview with Anthony Price. Anthony, thank you so much. I greatly appreciate you taking the time and sharing your knowledge with that. So this is a deal, get started, get up and going. Now is the time! Now, here is the thing. We got a short video that shows exactly how to do this MeetUp ninja trick, the link, what it looks like, how to find it and you’ll find it in this episode right here. Go to Flip2Freedom.com and search episode 126 on there. Episode 126 at Flip2Freedom.com.
Watch the video on where exactly he finds the link in that MeetUp group, right? In the MeetUp. And how to do that, and it’s a killer. All right, now if you want to learn more from Anthony, if you want to purchase properties from him in St. Louis, go to StLWholesaleDeals.com. You can get on his squeeze page, you can see what his squeeze page looks like, and check it out. That link will also be in the show notes. So Anthony again, thank you so much for dropping that bomb on us, appreciate it, that was killer! Until next time guys, take care and God bless.
Want a 30 day risk-free trial of Flip2Freedom Academy?

Subscribe To The Flip2Freedom Podcast:
  

Tagged With: cash buyers real estate investors, how to get a buyers list, list of cash buyers, real estate cash buyers listSean on Facebook…


Search Flip2Freedom 
 



 
 
Top 5 Posts



					F2F 122: How An 18-Year-Old Kid with $180 Made More Than $33K in 60 Days in the Most Competitive Market in the Country » Jaelin White
				



					F2F 083: How to Write a Wholesale Real Estate Purchase Contract Step by Step
				



					The Lighting Fast $5K Formula: How to Generate $5K in the Next 30 Days or Less…
				



					F2F 125: ZERO to $140K a Month in 18 Months » Bryan Harris
				



					PART II: Discover the EXACT Amount to Offer Using Zillow, How to LOGICALLY Present the Offer & How to Get the Contract Signed So You Can Make $5,700 Or More in 30 Days or Less…
				

Sean on Youtube…


Sean on Periscope…

 Flip2Freedom is a one of a kind website that will show you  how to escape the 9-to-5 and live a lifestyle most people only dream of.


This site will become your hub for interacting with like minded people on  the same quest for freedom.
 




 Flip2Freedom Academy is an exclusive cutting edge, online coaching program that is affordable,  interactive and is specifically designed to give you the tools and  education to quit your job in 19 weeks or less.






Have A Question?
Contact

 





 










HOW GET YOUR 1ST 5-FIGURE CHECK


FLIPPING HOUSES USING (3) STEALTH FUNDING STRATEGIES


















"100% FREE No Money Down Cheat Sheet" DOWNLOAD NOW 












 




























































VimeUhOh























Upload










Sorry, we couldn’t find that page


 Make sure you’ve typed the URL correctly, or try searching Vimeo. You could also watch one of the videos below instead. 





Search



















Cash&Carry Smart Foodservice Set June 17 Grand Opening For Coeur d'Alene StoreHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,475.42-2.41 (-0.10%)Dow 3021,796.55+85.54 (+0.39%)Nasdaq6,382.19-40.56 (-0.63%)Cash&Carry Smart Foodservice Set June 17 Grand Opening For Coeur d'Alene StorePR NewswireJune 12, 2017ReblogShareTweetSharePORTLAND, Ore., June 12, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Cash&Carry Smart Foodservice, a warehouse-format store that has catered to the foodservice industry for more than 60 years, will open their newest store in Coeur d'Alene, ID on Saturday, June 17.Cash&Carry Smart Foodservice (PRNewsfoto/Cash&Carry Smart Foodservice)MoreThe new Coeur d'Alene store is located at 208 E. Appleway Avenue and will be Cash&Carry's fourth in Idaho and the third in the local region, joining two Spokane, WA stores. The new location in Coeur d'Alene will be the 61st in the Western U.S.Offering a wide range of products designed to meet the needs of local foodservice businesses, the store will provide a one-stop shopping location for all foodservice needs.The 20,000 square-foot store, like all Cash&Carry locations, will carry more than 8,000 products including fresh produce, fresh meats, cheeses, dairy and deli products, frozen foods, grocery products, baking ingredients, beverages, bread and tortillas, janitorial supplies, catering supplies, tableware and barware. Though Cash&Carry stores cater primarily to the foodservice industry, they offer an easy, affordable option for non-profit organizations, schools, church groups, caterers and other individuals looking to purchase larger product quantities at lower prices."Our stores provide foodservice operators high quality products at the right prices," says John Mathews, Vice President of Sales and Marketing for Cash&Carry. "We are excited to open our newest store in Coeur d'Alene. Our unique layout and product offerings provide customers with large foodservice needs the opportunity to quickly and easily navigate our store and get the products they are looking for. This was a natural location to be more convenient for our existing customers and expand our reach to new customers in the region."Events InformationThe Grand Opening on June 17 will feature free hot dogs and ice cream, along with a grand prize drawing for a $250 Cash&Carry gift card and is open to everyone.About Cash&Carry Smart FoodserviceCash&Carry Smart Foodservice is a warehouse-format store catering to the foodservice industry based in Portland, Oregon. For over 60 years, the Company has offered a wide-range of larger quantity products in a convenient one-stop shop. As of June 1, 2017, the Company operated 60 warehouse stores in Oregon, Washington, Idaho, Nevada, California and Utah. Cash&Carry Smart Foodservice is the foodservice division of Smart & Final Stores, LLC (SFS), headquartered in Commerce (near Los Angeles), California. For more information, please visit the Cash&Carry Smart Foodservice website at www.smartfoodservice.com.For information, contact: Cash&Carry Smart Foodservice smartfoodservice@smartfoodservice.com To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/cashcarry-smart-foodservice-set-june-17-grand-opening-for-coeur-dalene-store-300472166.htmlReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextMcDonald's CEO: 'You have a choice to either be the disrupter or the disrupted'CNBCEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredSean Hannity responds to claim he ran up a $42,000 tab at Trump's hotel after flying in a 70-year-old lobster from MaineBusiness InsiderMarine dog with cancer gets tear-filled farewellAssociated PressTrump’s unwitting legacy could be universal health coverageYahoo FinanceZuckerberg Wife's Ambitious Secret Finally ExposedUNewz.MeSponsoredTwitter is only famous now because of President Trump: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoRolls-Royce Motor CEO: We’re not in the auto business. We’re in the luxury business.Yahoo FinanceAmazon ploughs ahead with high sales and spending; profit plungesReutersA Penny-Crypto Miracle Making Some Americans RichAgora FinancialSponsoredGOP senators hold press conference to demand assurances that GOP health plan does not become lawBusiness InsiderRepublicans kill the border taxYahoo FinanceAmazon could be the first trillion dollar company: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoWhat's the Problem with Joel Osteen?ChurchLeaders.comSponsoredHow grocers feel about Amazon: 'There was a lot of fear before, there's a lot more fear now'Yahoo FinanceBuffalo Wild Wings is killing one of customers' favorite dealsBusiness InsiderRussia lawmaker says US should expect painful response to sanctions — but could it really retaliate?Phillygirl: The Russians have already retaliated, they helped put Trump in office.  They cannot do anything worse to this countryJoin the Conversation1 / 5176











DNA Tracking Technology Identifies Products and People  |  FLOW OF WISDOM® | SEAN ANTHONY






































































FLOW OF WISDOM® | SEAN ANTHONY
Flow Of Wisdom® Radio Airs Live Sundays 3-5pm EST on GCNLive.com Call in 877-300-7645





Sean Anthony Biography
Contact | Booking
FLOW OF WISDOM RADIO
“Conversations with Hip Hop” by Sean Anthony
LISTEN TO FLOW OF WISDOM®
Flow Of Wisdom Health



	    			Social Media Links	    		


















About the Post



Author Information
Posted by: Sean Anthony | Flow of Wisdom
20 Year Radio Veteran, Sean Anthony is the Host of "Flow of Wisdom Radio." It airs live Sundays 3p-5p EST on the GCN Radio Networks (gcnlive.com.) Call in 877-300-7645.  He is also the author of "Conversations With Hip Hop" available on Amazon.com




Post Information
Posted on: October 12, 2013 Posted in: Alternative News
Comments: Leave a Comment





You are here: Home » DNA Tracking Technology Identifies Products and People

DNA Tracking Technology Identifies Products and People

Image Source http://sepetjian.wordpress.com/2011/12/21/debunking-deception-through-dna/
Brandon Turbeville
 Activist Post
Amidst the growing trend regarding the use of DNA by governments, corporations, law enforcement and the general surveillance state apparatus, researchers have now developed a system of DNA tagging that can be applied to objects, products, or humans in order to track and identify them at a later date.
Essentially, the idea behind this new technology is that a DNA marker is applied to an object, which is then sent on its way down the supply chain. At any point, the product is able to be identified by examining, amplifying, and sequencing the DNA marker which confirms the origin of the product.
Yet, as with the case of all technologies, what may not be inherently evil in and of itself – or even might provide some potential benefits – will inevitably become a tool of oppression by government and law enforcement specifically.
So, while this new technology could possibly prove useful in terms of the supply chain and shipping concerns, in 2013, any technology that is invented and released will immediately be picked up by the relevant government agencies of surveillance and control. Indeed, even before the technology is introduced to the market for commercial interests, law enforcement agencies are preparing to use the DNA markers for riot and crowd control as well other crime-related situations.  Read the full article….
 

Advertisements




 


Rate this:Share this:TweetShare on TumblrEmailMoreLike this:Like Loading...

Related
 
Tags: Activist Post, Brandon Turbeville, DNA, DNA marker, DNA markers, DNA TRACKING TECHNOLOGY, law enforcement, new technology 

← FLOW OF WISDOM:Rev Michelle Hopkins Alert! Puerto Rico Possible Comet Threat, ISON and MORE (Hour1)
FLOW OF WISDOM: Listener in Puerto Rico confirms FEMA reports & news translated (Hour1) →




No comments yet.
 

Leave your questions and comments Cancel reply 



Enter your comment here...




Fill in your details below or click an icon to log in:



























 
 


Email (Address never made public)



Name



Website














 You are commenting using your WordPress.com account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Twitter account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Facebook account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Google+ account. ( Log Out / Change )




Cancel
Connecting to %s




 Notify me of new comments via email. Notify me of new posts via email.
 



 

 


Sign up to Follow Flow Of Wisdom via Email

Enter your email address to follow FLOW OF WISDOM and receive notifications of new posts by email.
Join 16,397 other followers







 


Search






@flowofwisdom Instagram










“Like” FLOW OF WISDOM® on Facebook 

“Like” FLOW OF WISDOM® on Facebook

Follow @Sean_Anthony

				Good read. Stay strong @RealLamarOdom Thanks for sharing.  twitter.com/zachlowe_nba/s… 1 hour ago


				Proverbs 6:6 Go to the ant, thou sluggard; consider her ways, and be wise:  twitter.com/businessinside… 3 hours ago


				RT @ajplus: A young man was attacked with a K-9 and tasered after he was stopped by police while mowing lawns. https://t.co/mPnGUtypTl 3 hours ago


				RT @yourrightscamp: This is ridiculous 😡 https://t.co/XBcSEWo8tZ 3 hours ago

Follow @Sean_Anthony  Most Recent Posts 

Consciousness and Artificial Intelligence


Cashless Society, LHC 2.0 Blackholes & Quantum Theories


#2 The Merging of Machine and Humans


The Merging of Machine and Humans


Designer Babies


Evil and wickedness is rampant in the land. Brace yourself before reading this disturbing story.


5G, Advanced Medicine and the Internet Of Things


 Top Posts & Pages




































CategoriesCategories
Select Category
Alternative News
Anne Hidalgo
arsenic
Autism
big brother
Big Brother/Surveillance
big pharma
Bill Gates
Birth control
Breaking News
Brooklyn
CDC
center for disease control
Chemtrails
Commentary
   Ray Ford
Conspiracies
Conversations With Hip Hop
Dallas
dead
Documentary
ebola
Entertainment
featured
Flow Of Wisdom
FLOW OF WISDOM PODCAST
Flow of Wisdom Radio
Flow of Wisdom TV
FOW Info
Fox lied about Paris
Fox News
Fox News getting sued
fraud of psychiatric diagnosing
Geoengineering
HAARP
Health & Nutrition
Hip Hop
History
Inspiration
interview
Interviews
lead
Mayor of Paris
Media
mental health
mercury
microchip
MMR
Motivation
Motivational Speaking
Music
new world order
News
   Current Events
Op-Ed
patient
Politics
Preaching
prescription drugs
Press Release
propaganda
Prophecy
prophetic events
psychiatric drugs
Quick Vidz
Racism
Recovering From Autism
Relationships
remote control birth control
Science & Technology
Sean Anthony
sinkhole
Spiritual
tech news
Teen Issues
Teri Brogan
Thomas Duncan
UFO’s
unusual weather
vaccine
Vaccines
Videos
Weather


Follow @FlowofWisdom on Twitter

				Elon Musk told a group of America's governors “Until people see robots going down the street killing people, they...  fb.me/46nuWXpN1 1 day ago


				New package 📦 came in from @vitaminshoppe (Thank You 🙏🏾) About to try this new @bpi_sports #bestpreworkout with...  fb.me/u7WgM1gy 1 day ago


				The information and research I've been sharing on #flowofwisdom #radio for over the past year and a half is now...  fb.me/8xChoCYXC 1 day ago


				This company has an unusual workplace perk
A Wisconsin company called Three Square Market will offer employees...  fb.me/24MQdF1fU 2 days ago


				The original date of this broadcast was on July 23, 2017. Topics discussed: Consciousness in Artificial...  fb.me/1ugIBI7o6 2 days ago

Follow @flowofwisdom 





FLOW OF WISDOM® | SEAN ANTHONY


Powered by WordPress.com.
        								


















Post to



Cancel







 










 

Send to Email Address

Your Name

Your Email Address






Cancel

				Post was not sent - check your email addresses!			

				Email check failed, please try again			

				Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.			












 
 
%d bloggers like this:
















































































































































Amazon.co.uk Best Sellers: The most popular items in DVD & Blu-ray












































Amazon.co.uk




    Try Prime
  


















DVD & Blu-ray



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Global Store
Amazon Pantry
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Apps & Games
Baby
Beauty
Books
Car & Motorbike
CDs & Vinyl
Classical Music
Clothing
Computers & Accessories
Digital Music 
DIY & Tools
DVD & Blu-ray
Electronics & Photo
Fashion
Garden & Outdoors
Gift Cards
Grocery
Handmade
Health & Personal Care
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Jewellery
Kindle Store
Large Appliances
Lighting
LOVEFiLM by Post
Luggage
Luxury Beauty
Musical Instruments & DJ
PC & Video Games
Pet Supplies
Shoes & Bags
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Stationery & Office Supplies
Toys & Games
VHS
Watches





Go

















Shop byDepartment





Hello. Sign inYour AccountTryPrimeYourLists Basket0






Your Amazon.co.ukToday's DealsGift Cards & Top UpSellHelp






DVD & Blu-ray Movies TV Amazon Video Top Offers New & Future Releases Blu-ray Box Sets Best Sellers LOVEFiLM DVD Rental Advanced Search Browse Genres


















































































 Unlimited One-Day Delivery and more 
 Prime members also enjoy exclusive access to movies and TV shows, two million songs and much more. 

      >
      Get Started








There's a problem loading this menu at the moment.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.




















Amazon Best SellersOur most popular products based on sales.  Updated hourly.




Best Sellers in DVD & Blu-ray





        1.
      





            Beauty & The Beast [DVD] [2017]
        

Emma Watson


4.5 out of 5 stars

551

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





        2.
      





            Beauty & The Beast [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Emma Watson


4.5 out of 5 stars

551

Blu-ray£14.49 Amazon Prime





        3.
      





            Trolls [DVD]
        

Anna Kendrick


4.7 out of 5 stars

612

DVD£5.00 Amazon Prime





        4.
      





            The Boss Baby [DVD] [2017]
        

Tom McGrath


4.0 out of 5 stars

26

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 31 July 2017




        5.
      





            Kong: Skull Island [DVD + Digital Download] [2017]
        

Tom Hiddleston


3.8 out of 5 stars

256

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





        6.
      





            Kong: Skull Island [Blu-ray + Digital Download] [2017]
        



3.8 out of 5 stars

256

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime





        7.
      





            Logan [DVD] [2017]
        

Hugh Jackman


4.2 out of 5 stars

1,010

DVD£10.00 Amazon Prime





        8.
      





            Logan [Blu-ray + Digital HD] [2017]
        



4.2 out of 5 stars

1,010

Blu-ray£14.49 Amazon Prime





        9.
      





            Game of Thrones - Season 1-6 [DVD] [2016]
        

Peter Dinklage


4.4 out of 5 stars

230

DVD£47.49 Amazon Prime





        10.
      





            Moana [DVD] [2016]
        

Ron Clements


4.8 out of 5 stars

935

DVD£9.73 





        11.
      





            Fantastic Beasts and Where To Find Them [DVD + Digital Download] [2016]
        

Eddie Redmayne


4.3 out of 5 stars

1,619

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





        12.
      





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Chris Pratt


4.3 out of 5 stars

43

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 4 Sept. 2017




        13.
      





            Dunkirk (BBC) [DVD]
        

Benedict Cumberbatch


3.8 out of 5 stars

14

DVD£7.00 Amazon Prime





        14.
      





            The LEGO Batman Movie [DVD + Digital Download] [2017]
        

Will Arnett


4.4 out of 5 stars

320

DVD£10.00 Amazon Prime





        15.
      





            Fifty Shades Darker Unmasked Edition [DVD + Digital Copy] [2017]
        

Jamie Dornan


4.3 out of 5 stars

188

DVD£10.00 Amazon Prime





        16.
      





            Game of Thrones - Season 6 [DVD] [2016]
        

Peter Dinklage


4.7 out of 5 stars

1,369

DVD£19.49 Amazon Prime





        17.
      





            Barbara Currie - The Power of Yoga [DVD]
        



4.5 out of 5 stars

260

DVD£3.00 Amazon Prime





        18.
      





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [DVD] [2017]
        

Chris Pratt


4.3 out of 5 stars

43

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 4 Sept. 2017




        19.
      





            Sully: Miracle On The Hudson [DVD + Digital Download] [2017]
        

Tom Hanks


4.6 out of 5 stars

1,143

DVD£6.99 Amazon Prime





        20.
      





            Hacksaw Ridge [DVD] [2017]
        

Andrew Garfield


4.7 out of 5 stars

829

DVD£10.00 Amazon Prime






1-20
21-40
41-60
61-80
81-100





  About Best Sellers in DVD & Blu-ray


  These lists, updated hourly, contain best-selling items.




  RSS Feed 
  
    (Learn more)
  



Subscribe to: Best Sellers > DVD & Blu-ray






 ‹

     Any Department



 DVD & Blu-ray


Action & Adventure
Animation
Anime
Blu-ray
Blu-ray 3D
Bollywood
Box Sets
Children & Family
Comedy
Crime
Documentary
Drama
Exercise & Fitness
Fantasy
Gay, Lesbian & Transgender
Historical
Horror
Military & War
Music Video & Concert
Musical
Performing Arts
Reality TV
Romance
Science Fiction
Special Interest
Sport
Stand-Up Comedy
Steelbook
TV
Thriller
Western
World Cinema











More to Explore in DVD & Blu-ray



            Hot New Releases
            
›
See Top 100










            The Boss Baby [DVD] [2017]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [DVD] [2017]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime








            Bestseller Archive
            
›
See Top 100










            Rogue One: A Star Wars Story [Blu-ray]  [2017]
        

Blu-ray£15.00 Amazon Prime





            Fantastic Beasts and Where To Find Them [DVD + Digital Download] [2016]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





            Bridget Jones's Baby (DVD + Digital Download) [2016]
        

DVD£9.89 Amazon Prime








            Movers and Shakers
            
›
See Top 100










            Buster Keaton: 3 Films (Sherlock Jr., The General, Steamboat Bill, Jr.) [Masters of Cinema] Limited Edition Blu-ray Boxed Set
        

Blu-ray£37.99 Amazon Prime





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.2 UHD [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Blu-ray£26.99 Amazon Prime





            Stephen King's It [Blu-ray] [2016] [Region Free]
        

Blu-ray£7.99 Amazon Prime








            Most Wished For
            
›
See Top 100










            Beauty & The Beast [DVD] [2017]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime





            Spider-Man Homecoming [Blu-ray + Comic] [2017]
        

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime








            Most Gifted
            
›
See Top 100










            Beauty & The Beast [DVD] [2017]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





            Beauty & The Beast [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Blu-ray£14.49 Amazon Prime





            Moana [DVD] [2016]
        

DVD£9.73 































        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.






        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.








  Back to top      Get to Know Us   Careers   About Us   UK Modern Slavery Statement      Make Money with Us   Sell on Amazon   Sell on Amazon Business   Associates Programme   Fulfilment by Amazon   Advertise Your Products   Independently Publish with Us   Amazon Pay   Become an Amazon Vendor   › See all      Amazon Payment Methods   Amazon Platinum Mastercard   Amazon Money Store   Gift Cards   Amazon Currency Converter   Payment Methods Help   Shop with Points   Top Up Your Account      Let Us Help You   Track Packages or View Orders   Delivery Rates & Policies   Amazon Prime   Returns & Replacements   Manage Your Content and Devices   Amazon Mobile App   Amazon Assistant   Help               Australia   Brazil   Canada   China   France   Germany   India   Italy   Japan   Mexico   Netherlands   Spain   United States         Amazon Music Stream millionsof songs       AbeBooks Books, art& collectables       ACX Audiobook PublishingMade Easy       Amazon BuyVIP The EuropeanShopping Club          Amazon Tickets Music, Theatre& Comedy       Amazon Web Services Scalable CloudComputing Services       Audible DownloadAudio Books       Book Depository Books With FreeDelivery Worldwide          DPReview DigitalPhotography       Goodreads Book reviews& recommendations       IMDb Movies, TV& Celebrities       Junglee.com Shop Onlinein India          Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital PublishingMade Easy       Prime Now 2-Hour Deliveryon Everyday Essentials       Shopbop DesignerFashion Brands       Yoyo.com A Happy PlaceTo Shop For Toys          Souq.com Shop Online inthe Middle East       Warehouse Deals Deep DiscountsOpen-Box Products       LOVEFiLM DVD & Blu-rayTo Rent By Post       Amazon Business Service forbusiness customers          Conditions of Use & Sale   Privacy Notice   Cookies & Internet Advertising   © 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates    




v
































Amazon.co.uk Best Sellers: The most popular items in Thriller












































Amazon.co.uk




    Try Prime
  


















DVD & Blu-ray



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Global Store
Amazon Pantry
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Apps & Games
Baby
Beauty
Books
Car & Motorbike
CDs & Vinyl
Classical Music
Clothing
Computers & Accessories
Digital Music 
DIY & Tools
DVD & Blu-ray
Electronics & Photo
Fashion
Garden & Outdoors
Gift Cards
Grocery
Handmade
Health & Personal Care
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Jewellery
Kindle Store
Large Appliances
Lighting
LOVEFiLM by Post
Luggage
Luxury Beauty
Musical Instruments & DJ
PC & Video Games
Pet Supplies
Shoes & Bags
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Stationery & Office Supplies
Toys & Games
VHS
Watches





Go

















Shop byDepartment





Hello. Sign inYour AccountTryPrimeYourLists Basket0






Your Amazon.co.ukToday's DealsGift Cards & Top UpSellHelp






DVD & Blu-ray Movies TV Amazon Video Top Offers New & Future Releases Blu-ray Box Sets Best Sellers LOVEFiLM DVD Rental Advanced Search Browse Genres














































































 Unlimited One-Day Delivery and more 
 Prime members also enjoy exclusive access to movies and TV shows, two million songs and much more. 

      >
      Get Started








There's a problem loading this menu at the moment.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.




















Amazon Best SellersOur most popular products based on sales.  Updated hourly.




Best Sellers in Thriller





        1.
      





            Kong: Skull Island [DVD + Digital Download] [2017]
        

Tom Hiddleston


3.8 out of 5 stars

256

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





        2.
      





            Kong: Skull Island [Blu-ray + Digital Download] [2017]
        



3.8 out of 5 stars

256

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime





        3.
      





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Chris Pratt


4.3 out of 5 stars

43

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 4 Sept. 2017




        4.
      





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [DVD] [2017]
        

Chris Pratt


4.3 out of 5 stars

43

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 4 Sept. 2017




        5.
      





            Pirates of the Caribbean: Salazar's Revenge [DVD] [2017]
        

Johnny Depp


4.2 out of 5 stars

27

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 2 Oct. 2017




        6.
      





            Kong: Skull Island [Blu-ray 3D + Blu-ray + Digital Download] [2017]
        



3.8 out of 5 stars

256

Blu-ray£18.99 Amazon Prime





        7.
      





            The Girl on the Train [DVD]
        

Emily Blunt


3.5 out of 5 stars

903

DVD£6.99 Amazon Prime





        8.
      





            Kong: Skull Island [4k Ultra HD + Blu-ray + Digital Download] [2017]
        



3.8 out of 5 stars

256

Blu-ray£24.99 Amazon Prime





        9.
      





            Alien Covenant [Blu-ray] [2017]
        



3.4 out of 5 stars

85

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 18 Sept. 2017




        10.
      





            John Wick: Chapter 2 [Blu-ray + Digital Download] [2017]
        

Keanu Reeves


4.0 out of 5 stars

829

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime





        11.
      





            Resident Evil: The Final Chapter [DVD] [2017]
        

Milla Jovovich


3.8 out of 5 stars

260

DVD£6.49 Amazon Prime





        12.
      





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Chris Pratt


4.3 out of 5 stars

43

Blu-ray£17.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 4 Sept. 2017




        13.
      





            Life (Blu-ray) [2017]
        

Jake Gyllenhaal


3.6 out of 5 stars

79

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 31 July 2017




        14.
      





            Underworld: Blood Wars [DVD] [2017]
        

Kate Beckinsale


3.9 out of 5 stars

318

DVD£6.51 Amazon Prime





        15.
      





            Life (DVD) [2017]
        

Jake Gyllenhaal


3.6 out of 5 stars

79

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 31 July 2017




        16.
      





            Pirates of the Caribbean: Salazar's Revenge [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Johnny Depp


4.2 out of 5 stars

27

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 2 Oct. 2017




        17.
      





            Spectre [DVD] [2015]
        

Daniel Craig


4.1 out of 5 stars

3,060

DVD£5.00 Amazon Prime





        18.
      





            Life (2 disc BD & 4K UHD) [Blu-ray] [2017]
        



5.0 out of 5 stars

3

Blu-ray£19.99 Amazon Prime

Release Date: 31 July 2017




        19.
      





            Pretty Little Liars - Season 7 [DVD] [2017]
        

Troian Bellisario


4.5 out of 5 stars

15

DVD£20.00 Amazon Prime





        20.
      





            Inferno [DVD] [2016]
        

Tom Hanks


3.8 out of 5 stars

587

DVD£6.00 Amazon Prime






1-20
21-40
41-60
61-80
81-100





  About Best Sellers in Thriller


  These lists, updated hourly, contain best-selling items.




  RSS Feed 
  
    (Learn more)
  



Subscribe to: Best Sellers > Thriller






 ‹

     Any Department



DVD & Blu-ray


Action & Adventure
Animation
Anime
Blu-ray
Blu-ray 3D
Bollywood
Box Sets
Children & Family
Comedy
Crime
Documentary
Drama
Exercise & Fitness
Fantasy
Gay, Lesbian & Transgender
Historical
Horror
Military & War
Music Video & Concert
Musical
Performing Arts
Reality TV
Romance
Science Fiction
Special Interest
Sport
Stand-Up Comedy
Steelbook
TV
Thriller
Western
World Cinema











More to Explore in Thriller



            Hot New Releases
            
›
See Top 100










            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [DVD] [2017]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





            Pirates of the Caribbean: Salazar's Revenge [DVD] [2017]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime








            Most Wished For
            
›
See Top 100










            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [Blu-ray] [2017]
        

Blu-ray£14.99 Amazon Prime





            Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 2 [DVD] [2017]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





            Pirates of the Caribbean: Salazar's Revenge [DVD] [2017]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime








            Most Gifted
            
›
See Top 100










            Kong: Skull Island [DVD + Digital Download] [2017]
        

DVD£9.99 Amazon Prime





            Legend [DVD] [2015]
        

DVD£5.00 Amazon Prime





            Bridge of Spies [DVD] [2015]
        

DVD£5.00 Amazon Prime































        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.






        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.







Back to top
Get to Know UsCareersAbout UsUK Modern Slavery StatementMake Money with UsSell on AmazonSell on Amazon BusinessAssociates ProgrammeFulfilment by AmazonAdvertise Your ProductsIndependently Publish with UsAmazon PayBecome an Amazon Vendor›See allAmazon Payment MethodsAmazon Platinum MastercardAmazon Money StoreGift CardsAmazon Currency ConverterPayment Methods HelpShop with PointsTop Up Your AccountLet Us Help YouTrack Packages or View OrdersDelivery Rates & PoliciesAmazon PrimeReturns & ReplacementsManage Your Content and DevicesAmazon Mobile AppAmazon AssistantHelp

AustraliaBrazilCanadaChinaFranceGermanyIndiaItalyJapanMexicoNetherlandsSpainUnited States

Amazon Music Stream millions of songs

AbeBooks Books, art & collectables

ACX Audiobook Publishing Made Easy

Amazon BuyVIP The European Shopping Club

 

Amazon Tickets Music, Theatre & Comedy

Amazon Web Services Scalable Cloud Computing Services

Audible Download Audio Books

Book Depository Books With Free Delivery Worldwide

 

DPReview Digital Photography

Goodreads Book reviews & recommendations

IMDb Movies, TV & Celebrities

Junglee.com Shop Online in India

 

Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital Publishing Made Easy

Prime Now 2-Hour Delivery on Everyday Essentials

Shopbop Designer Fashion Brands

Yoyo.com A Happy Place To Shop For Toys

 

Souq.com Shop Online in the Middle East

Warehouse Deals Deep Discounts Open-Box Products

LOVEFiLM DVD & Blu-ray To Rent By Post

Amazon Business Service for business customers


Conditions of Use & SalePrivacy NoticeCookies & Internet Advertising© 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates




v























